New Jersey, session 222, A2032.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  There shall be established in the General Fund a dedicated account entitled the "Electric Vehicle Battery Repurposing Fund that shall be credited for each State fiscal year with an amount equivalent to the amount required to be set aside pursuant to subsection b. of this section.  The amounts credited to the Electric Battery Repurposing Fund shall be appropriated exclusively to support repurposing, remanufacturing, and recycling of electric vehicle batteries in an environmentally safe manner. b.    There shall be credited annually from the General Fund into the Electric Battery Repurposing Fund an amount equal to $500 for each retail sale of an electronic vehicle in this State during the prior State fiscal year. c.  As used in this section, Electric vehicle means a vehicle that derives all or part of its power from electricity supplied by the electric grid, and that has a battery or equivalent energy storage device that can be charged from an electricity supply external to the vehicle with an electric plug.  "Electric vehicle" includes a plug-in hybrid vehicle. Electric vehicle battery means a rechargeable battery that is used to power the electric motor of an electric vehicle.  Electric vehicle battery includes, but is not limited to, lithium-ion batteries, nickel-metal hydride batteries, and lead-acid batteries. Plug-in hybrid vehicle means a vehicle that can be charged from a source of electricity external to the vehicle through an electric plug, but is not exclusively powered by electricity. Remanufacturing means a standardized industrial process that takes place within industrial or factory settings, in which cores of electric vehicle batteries are restored to original as-new condition and performance or better, which process is in line with specific technical specifications including engineering, quality, and testing standards, and typically yielding fully warranted products. Repurposing means configuring of a used electric vehicle battery into a system to be utilized in a different application, including but not limited to stationary storage most commonly referred to as second-life or battery second use. Recycling" means a process by which materials in an electric vehicle battery which would otherwise become solid waste are collected, separated, or processed and returned in an environmentally safe manner to the economic mainstream in the form of raw materials or products. d.    The Commissioner of Environmental Protection, in consultation with the Director of the Division of Taxation, may adopt pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), rules and regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this section concerning the use of the amounts credited to the Electric Battery Repurposing Fund. e.  The Director of the Division of Taxation in the Department of the Treasury, in consultation with the Chief Administrator of the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission, shall provide the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting data on number of retail sales of electric vehicles that shall be reported by retail automobile dealers made in this State during the State fiscal year last completed prior to the State fiscal year in which the director shall calculate and credit the amount from the General Fund to be made into the Electric Battery Repurposing Fund. 2.  This act shall take effect on the first day of the second month beginning after the date of enactment.